Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-1826
Act, how cited.

Sections 14-1801 to 14-1826 shall be known and may be cited as the Transit Authority Law.

Laws 1957, c. 23, § 28, p. 176;

Laws 1972, LB 1275, § 20;

Laws 1998, LB 1191, § 15.